Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB183.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5733(g) of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5733. Rules and regulations.* * *(g) Water standards.--[If a food establishment uses or supplies water for human consumption, the water shall be in compliance with the primary and secondary Maximum Contaminant Levels (MCL), treatment techniques and Maximum Residual Disinfectant Levels (MRDL) required by the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, and its attendant regulations.](1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a food establishment uses or supplies water for human 123456789101112131415161718 consumption, regardless of the size of the bottle or container:(i) The water shall be in compliance with the requirements under 21 CFR Pts. 129 (relating to processing and bottling of bottled drinking water ) and 165 (relating to beverages).(ii) The food est ablishment shall utilize a water source:(A) that meets the siting, design, construction, maintenance and withdrawal requirements established by the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, and regulations promulgated thereunder; or(B) from a jurisdiction that administers standards no less stringent than those established under the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act.(iii) The department may accept documentation from the Department of Environmental Protection to determine that a water source satisfies the requirements under this subsection.(2) Bottled water products manufactured in accordance with paragraph (1):(i) Shall be labeled in accordance with all requirements under the Federal acts and regulations promulgated thereunder.(ii) Shall not be required to use, carry or be subject to any label or labeling requirements not specifically required by the Federal acts and regulations promulgated thereunder.(iii) Shall be subject to the recall provisions 20250SB0183PN0122 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specified in the Federal acts and regulations promulgated thereunder.(iv) Shall not be subject to any recall provision or process not specified in the Federal acts and regulations promulgated thereunder.(3) I t is the intent of this subsection to vest exclusive jurisdiction for enforcement of the Federal acts and regulations promulgated thereunder in the department.* * *Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the amendment of 3 Pa.C.S. § 5733(g).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0183PN0122 - 3 - 12345678910111213